California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(a) Any person who willfully and knowingly damages or destroys any field crop product, as specified in Sections 42510 and 52001, that is known by the person to be the subject of testing or a product development program being conducted by, or in conjunction or cooperation with the University of California, the California State University System, or any other federal, state, or local government agency, shall be liable for twice the value of the crop damaged or destroyed. For purposes of this subdivision, “in conjunction or cooperation with” means having a contract with the University of California, the California State University System, or any other federal, state, or local government agency involving testing or a product development program relating to that field crop product.

(b) Damages available under this section shall be limited to twice actual damages involving research, testing, and crop development costs directly related to the crop that has been damaged or destroyed.

(c) The rights and remedies available under this section are in addition to any other rights or remedies otherwise available in law or statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. California Seed Law [52251. - 52515.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [52251. - 52262.]

52251.

This chapter shall be known as the “California Seed Law.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52252.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52253.

“Advertisement” means representations, except those on the label, which are disseminated in any manner or by any means that relate to seed which is subject to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52254.

“Agricultural seed” means the seed of any domesticated grass or cereal, and of any legume or other plant that is grown as turf, cover crop, forage crop, fiber crop, or field crop, and mixtures of such seeds. It does not, however, include any variety that is generally known and sold as flower seed or vegetable seed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52254.3.

“Board” means the Seed Advisory Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

52254.4.

“Certification” means to certify as to the variety, purity, quality, type, strain, or other genetic character of agricultural or vegetable seed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52254.5.

“Labeler” means any person whose name and address appears on the label pertaining to or attached to a lot or container of agricultural or vegetable seed, or both agricultural and vegetable seed, for sale and distribution within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

52255.

“Labeling” means all labels, and other written, printed, or graphic representations, in any form whatsoever, which accompany and pertain to any seed whether the seed is in bulk or in containers, and it includes invoices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52255.5.

“Noncommercial seed sharing activity” means the receiving or giving away of seed by a noncommercial entity without the creation of a contractual obligation or an expectation to receive anything of value in return. This definition does not prohibit a noncommercial entity engaging in noncommercial seed sharing activity from receiving the progeny of the seeds it distributes to the extent that the activity does not violate the federal Plant Variety Protection Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2321 et seq.). Noncommercial seed sharing activity does not include receiving, storing, or distributing patented seed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 64.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52256.

“Noxious weed seed” means the seed or propagule of any species of noxious weed, as defined in Section 5004. As used in this chapter, noxious weed seed are of two classes, prohibited noxious weed seed and restricted noxious weed seed, which are defined in Sections 52257 and 52258, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

52256.5.

“Person” also means any individual, partnership, corporation, trust association, cooperative association, or any other business unit or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52257.

“Prohibited noxious weed seed” means the seed or propagule of any species of noxious weed which the director, as provided in Section 52332, finds and declares to be a prohibited noxious weed seed and which either: (1) is not known to occur, or is of limited distribution, in this state; (2) is not widely distributed throughout the state and which not only reproduce by seed, but also by underground roots or stems; or (3) is under eradication measures in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

52257.5.

“Conditioner” means any person who cleans, scarifies, or blends to obtain uniform quality, or who conducts other operations which would change the purity, germination, or identity of any lot of seed, including, but not limited to, packaging, labeling, blending together of uniform lots of the same kind or variety, or the preparation of a mixture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52257.6.

“Process” means any modification of the form or nature of agricultural or vegetable seed, or any treatment of the seed, which renders it inviable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52257.8.

“Research” means any research related to the variety, purity, quality, type, strain, or other genetic and physiological characteristics of agricultural or vegetable seed or the production thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52258.

“Restricted noxious weed seed” means the seed or propagule of any species of noxious weed, the seed of which is not otherwise designated as prohibited noxious weed seed, and which the director, as provided in Section 52332, finds and declares to be a restricted noxious weed seed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

52259.

“Vegetable seed” means the seed of any crop which is or may be grown in gardens or on truck farms and which is generally known and sold under the name of vegetable seed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52260.

“Weed seed” means any noxious weed seed or vegetable seeds, and any seed that is not included in the definitions of agricultural seed, if it occurs incidentally in agricultural seed or vegetable seeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52261.

“Viability” means a description of living seeds which are capable of germinating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

52262.

“Farm” means a place of agricultural production which has annual sales of agricultural products of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [52281. - 52289.]

52281.

This chapter and the terms which are used in it shall be construed so as to conform insofar as possible with the construction which is placed upon the Federal Seed Act (7 U.S.C., Sec. 1551, et seq.) and regulations which are issued pursuant to that act, and to effectuate its purpose to make uniform the laws of the states adopting it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52282.

The secretary and, under the supervision and direction of the secretary, the commissioner of each county and the qualified representative of the commissioner, shall enforce this chapter and carry out its provisions and requirements. The secretary shall have the discretion to determine which enforcement activities are conducted by the commissioner in each county and which enforcement activities shall be conducted by department personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

52283.

The director may cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture and other agencies in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52284.

The director may issue such orders, circulars, and announcements as he may deem necessary to further the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52285.

If the director or the commissioner finds that any person has violated any provision of this chapter, he may institute proceedings in the court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the violation occurred, to have such person convicted of the violation, or he may file with the district attorney with the view of prosecution such evidence as may be deemed necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52286.

The director shall maintain a properly equipped laboratory for examining and testing seeds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52287.

All prohibited and restricted noxious weed seed which are enumerated in this chapter or in any regulation which is adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter are hereby recognized as noxious within the meaning of the Federal Seed Act (7 U.S.C., Sec. 1551, et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

52288.

The Legislature hereby declares all of the following:

(a) It is the intent of this chapter to enable the seed industry, with the aid of the state, to ensure that seed purchased by the consumer-buyer is properly identified and of the quality and amount represented on the tag or label.

(b) The success of agriculture and the seed industry in this state depends upon the continued commitment to industry-funded research in order to improve the quality and variety of seed available to the consumer-buyer.

(c) Noncommercial seed sharing
 activity contributes significant value to the health of our communities and to the resilience of our food system. This chapter is intended to support noncommercial seed sharing activity and is not intended to supersede any provision of the California Rice Certification Act of 2000 (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 55000) of Division 20).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 259, Sec. 2.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52289.

The department may post information on its Internet Web site about noncommercial seed sharing activity that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Germination or varietal purity standards.

(b) Compliance with the federal Plant Variety Protection Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2321 et seq.).

(c) Best practices for entities participating in noncommercial seed sharing activities, including public disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 65.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Seed Advisory Board [52291. - 52298.]

52291.

There is in the department a Seed Advisory Board consisting of 11 members appointed by the secretary, seven of whom shall be labelers registered under the provisions of this chapter, two of whom shall be persons who receive or possess seed for sale in this state, and two of whom shall be members of the public. The members of the board who are labelers registered under the provisions of this chapter shall be representative of the functions of seed production, conditioning, marketing, or utilization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52291.1.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that labelers appointed to the Seed Advisory Board pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such board, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------

52292.

The term of office for each member of the board is three years. Vacancies shall be filled by the secretary for an unexpired term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 573, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

52295.

Members of the board shall receive no salary but may be allowed per diem in accordance with Department of General Services rules for attendance at meetings and other board activities authorized by the board and approved by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 31.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

52296.

The board shall be advisory to the secretary and may make recommendations on all matters pertaining to this chapter including, but not limited to, seed law and regulations, enforcement, seed laboratory diagnostics and annual budgets required to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The board shall be advisory as to the scope of the program funded by industry and recommend the dollar volume assessments, which, when combined with the registration fee required by this chapter, shall provide adequate funds to support the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 573, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

52297.

The board shall annually elect a chairman from its membership, and from time to time such other officers as it may deem advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

52298.

The board shall meet at the call of its chairman or the director, or at the request of any four members of the board. The board shall meet at least once a year to review budget proposals and fiscal matters related to such proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Genetically Engineered Plants [52300. - 52306.]

52300.

For purposes of this article only, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Farmer” means the person responsible for planting a crop, managing the crop, and harvesting the crop from land on which a breach of contract or patent infringement is alleged to have occurred.

(b) “Genetically engineered plant” means a plant or any plant part or material, including, but not limited to, seeds and pollen, in which the genetic material has been changed through modern biotechnology in a way that does not occur naturally by multiplication or natural recombination.

(c) “Modern biotechnology” means the application of either of the following:

(1) In vitro nucleic acid techniques, including recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and direct injection of nucleic acid into cells or organelles.

(2) Fusion of cells beyond the taxonomic family that overcome natural physiological reproductive or recombinant barriers and that are not techniques used in traditional breeding and selection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52301.

(a) Before a person or his or her agent holding a patent on a genetically engineered plant, may enter upon any land farmed by another for the purpose of obtaining crop samples to determine whether breach of contract or patent infringement has occurred, the person holding the patent or his or her agent shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the farmer in writing of the allegation that breach of contract or patent infringement has occurred and request permission to enter upon the farmer’s land.

(2) Provide a copy of that notification to the secretary.

(3)Obtain the written permission of the farmer.

(4) Provide notice to the farmer of the following procedures which shall be applicable as provided:

(A) If the farmer withholds permission, the person holding a patent may petition the superior court in the county in which the alleged breach of contract or patent infringement has occurred for an order granting permission to enter upon the farmer’s land.

(B) If the person holding a patent believes that the crop from which samples are to be taken may be subject to intentional damage or destruction, the person may seek a protective order from the superior court. The protective order shall be crafted to minimize interruption or interference with normal farming practices, including harvest and tillage.

(C) The procedures described in Section 52302.

(b) The farmer shall grant or deny access in writing within 10 days of receipt of a request to enter the land pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52302.

If requested by either party, the secretary or his or her designee shall be present for the sampling, provide for the collection of samples, or conduct any other aspect of the sampling or analysis process as requested. The secretary shall designate an employee or enter into an agreement with an employee or agent of the State of California or a third party unaffiliated with either party to carry out the specified sampling activity as provided in regulations adopted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 52251) of Division 18. The patentholder shall pay the fee charged by the department under regulations adopted pursuant to that article. The farmer or the agent of the farmer and the person holding the patent may be present at any collection of samples conducted pursuant to this article, and each shall be notified of the time and location of the sample taking at least 24 hours in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52303.

Samples for analysis may be taken from a standing crop, from representative standing plants in the field, or from crop residue remaining in the field after harvest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52304.

The results of any testing conducted pursuant to this article shall be sent by registered letter by the testing party to all parties involved in the investigation within 30 days after the results are reported from the testing laboratory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52305.

A farmer shall not be liable based on the presence or possession of a patented genetically engineered plant on real property owned or occupied by the farmer when the farmer did not knowingly buy or otherwise knowingly acquire the genetically engineered plant, the farmer acted in good faith and without knowledge of the genetically engineered nature of the plant, and when the genetically engineered plant is detected at a de minimis level. The authority of a court to determine the presence of de minimis levels of a genetically engineered plant is intended solely for the purpose of assisting in adjudicating claims relating to the possession or use of a patented genetically engineered plant in which the seed labeler, patentholder, or licensee, has rights. Nothing in this section is intended to do any of the following:

(a) Establish, or be used as the basis for establishing, an acceptable level at which a patented genetically engineered plant may be present.

(b) Be used to alter or limit liabilities or remedies for personal injury or wrongful death.

(c) Be used outside or beyond the scope or context of a legal dispute regarding genetically engineered plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52306.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions [52311. - 52311.]

52311.

A person is not subject to the penalties which are prescribed by this chapter in any of the following cases:

(a) For selling in this state any agricultural or vegetable seed which is incorrectly labeled or represented as to kind, variety, or type, which seed cannot be identified by examination of it, unless he has failed to obtain an invoice or grower’s declaration which gives the commonly accepted name of the kind, kind and variety, or kind and type, and to take such other precautions as may be necessary to insure the identity to be that which is stated.

(b) As to any matter which is required by Article 8 (commencing with Section 52451) of this chapter, for selling such seed in original unopened sealed packages which are fully labeled by another dealer, unless he has failed to have such seed retested and relabeled as to the percentage of germination within the period which is prescribed by Section 52481, or unless he has failed to correct the label after notice that such label has been found to be incorrect.

(c) For shipping, delivering, transporting, or selling within this state any agricultural or vegetable seed which has a false labeling as to percentage of germination or hard seeds, unless he has first been given an opportunity by the director to be heard. This exemption does not, however, relieve any person from the obligation, upon order of an enforcement official, to stop further sale of any seed which is found to be incorrectly labeled as to germination, nor does it exempt such seed from seizure pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Funding [52321. - 52325.]

52321.

All money that is received by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be expended only for the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 277, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

52322.

The secretary shall prepare an annual statement of the operating expenditures and income related to this chapter that shall be presented to the board for review as soon as possible following the termination of any fiscal year. A copy of this statement shall be made available to any interested person upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 385, Sec. 1.   (SB 348)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

52323.

(a) The department’s cost of carrying out this chapter shall be funded from money that is received by the secretary pursuant to this chapter. The secretary shall also pay annually, in arrears, one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) to counties as an annual subvention for costs incurred in the enforcement of this chapter. The department’s costs of administering this chapter shall be paid before allocating funds to the counties under this section.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1,
 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

52324.

(a) The subvention program under Section 52323 is an optional program available to counties. The subvention to counties under Section 52323 shall be annually apportioned as follows:

(1) At the discretion of the secretary and upon recommendation of the board, counties with no registered seed labelers may annually receive one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) Counties with registered seed labeler operations shall receive subventions based upon enforcement activity generated by the registered seed labeler operations within the county and upon the performance of enforcement activities necessary to carry out this chapter.

(b) This
 section shall become inoperative on July 1,
 2027, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

52325.

(a) Commissioners of counties that choose to participate in the subvention program shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the secretary, whereby the commissioner agrees to maintain a statewide compliance level, determined by the secretary, on all seed within the county. The cooperative agreement shall be in effect for a five-year period. The amount of the subvention designated to each individual participating county shall be established in a memorandum of understanding between the commissioner and the secretary, in consultation with the board.

(b) The secretary, upon recommendation of the board or upon the secretary’s own initiative, may withhold a portion of the funds designated to a county if that county fails to meet the performance standards established
 by the secretary and set forth in the cooperative agreement with that county.

(c) The secretary shall provide a written justification to the board for any action taken by the secretary that does not fully implement a recommendation made by the board pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2031, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 128, Sec. 3.   (AB 1583)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2027.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulations [52331. - 52334.]

52331.

The director, by regulations, shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt germination standards for vegetable seed.

(b) Adopt tolerances to be applied in all enforcement procedure required by this chapter.

(c) Prescribe methods of procedure in the examination of lots of any agricultural or vegetable seed, and in securing samples of such lots.

(d) Establish a reasonable schedule of fees for tests, examinations, and services except those which are required for quarantine or other purposes, not directly related to the enforcement of this chapter. The schedule shall be based upon the approximate cost of the service rendered. The director may, however, provide for the examination of seeds for identification purposes without charge.

(e) Adopt such other regulations as will assist in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Every standard or tolerance which is adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be as nearly as practicable to that which is established under the Federal Seed Act (7 U.S.C., Sec. 1551, et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52332.

The secretary, by regulation, may adopt all of the following:

(a) A list of the plants and crops that the secretary finds are or may be grown in this state.

(b) A list of the plants and crops that the secretary finds are detrimental to agriculture if they occur incidentally in other crops, and which, therefore, are classed as weed seed except if sold alone or as a specific constituent of a definite seed mixture.

(c) A list of noxious weed seed that the secretary finds are prohibited noxious weed seed, as defined in this chapter.

(d) A list of those noxious weed seed that are not classified as
 prohibited noxious weed seed and are classified by this chapter as restricted noxious weed seed.

(e) A list of substances that are likely to be used for treating grain or other crop seed that the secretary finds and determines are toxic to human beings or animals if used, and an appropriate warning or caution statement for each substance.

(f) (1) (A) Methods and procedures, upon the recommendation of the board, for the conciliation, mediation, or arbitration of disputes between labelers and any persons concerning conformance with label statements, advertisements, financial terms or the lack of payment by a dealer to a grower, or other disputes regarding the quality or performance of seed. The methods and procedures shall be a mandatory prerequisite to pursuing other dispute resolution mechanisms, including, but not limited to,
 litigation. However, if conciliation, mediation, or arbitration proceedings are commenced under this section to resolve a controversy, the statute of limitations that applies to a civil action concerning that controversy is tolled upon commencement of the conciliation, mediation, or arbitration proceedings, and until 30 days after the completion of those proceedings. As used in this subdivision, “completion of those proceedings” means the filing of a statement of agreement or nonagreement by the conciliator or mediator, or the rendering of a decision by an arbitrator or arbitration committee.

(B) If a proceeding for the conciliation, mediation, or arbitration of a dispute between a dealer and a grower is commenced under this subdivision for conformance with the financial terms by a dealer to a grower, and the decision in the proceeding is in favor of the grower, the decision may include a provision requiring compensation to the grower for the
 estimated value of the seed production services a grower provides to a dealer, including, but not limited to, labor, care, and expense in growing and harvesting that product.

(C) If a dealer fails to comply with the financial obligations of a judgment rendered in a conciliation, mediation, or arbitration proceeding between a dealer and a grower commenced pursuant to this subdivision following the conclusion of all appeals in the proceeding, the secretary may revoke the dealer’s registration and prevent the dealer from renewing his or her registration until the time the financial obligation is fulfilled.

(2) Conciliation, mediation, or arbitration shall not affect any enforcement action by the secretary pursuant to this chapter. Regulations adopted by the secretary for the mandatory conciliation, mediation, or arbitration of disputes shall require that adequate notice be provided
 on the seed label notifying any buyer of the requirement to submit a dispute to mandatory conciliation, mediation, or arbitration as a prerequisite to other dispute resolution mechanisms, including litigation.

(g) Additional labeling requirements for coated, pelleted, encapsulated, mat, tape, or any other germination medium or device used on seed in order that the purchaser or consumer will be informed as to the actual amount of seed purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 143.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52333.

The director may, by regulation, adopt standards, including noxious weed seed and other pest standards, for premises from which seed shipments are exempt from the provisions of Section 6501 and shall designate such premises as origin inspected warehouses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 288.)
-------------------------------------------

52334.

The declaration of a plant, seed, nursery stock, or crop as invasive is a power reserved for the secretary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 13.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Registration and Assessment [52351. - 52356.]

52351.

Every labeler of agricultural or vegetable seed offered for sale in this state, or any person, as defined in Section 52256.5, who sells that seed in this state, shall annually register with the secretary to obtain authorization to sell agricultural or vegetable seed before engaging in this activity, except any of the following:

(a) An individual grower that conditions such seed exclusively for the grower’s own planting use.

(b) A person using agricultural or vegetable seed, or both agricultural and vegetable seed, only for purposes of planting seed increase.

(c) Any person licensed to sell nursery stock pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6701) of Part 3 of Division 4, except when he or she also engages in activities as defined under Section 52257.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52351.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 52351, the secretary may require any entity that conducts noncommercial seed sharing activity to provide notification of its activity on a form created by the secretary. The notification form shall only include the entity’s name and address and the contact information of the responsible party. No fee shall
 be assessed for submitting the notification form.

(b) An entity shall not be subject to any penalties under this chapter for failing to provide notification to the secretary without first receiving a written request to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 259, Sec. 4.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52352.

Each application for an annual registration shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in the amount of forty dollars ($40) for each fiscal year or portion of a fiscal year beginning July 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

52353.

If a registration is not renewed within one calendar month after the beginning of the fiscal year, a penalty of 20 percent of the annual registration fee due shall be added to the fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

52354.

Each person who is required to be registered pursuant to Section 52351 shall pay an assessment annually to the secretary in an amount not to exceed forty cents ($0.40) per one hundred dollars ($100) gross annual dollar volume sales of agricultural or vegetable seed, or both, in this state for the preceding fiscal year defined in Section 52352, except in the following cases:

(a) No assessment shall be paid by any labeler or any other person for any agricultural or vegetable seed for which the assessment has been previously paid by another labeler or person, unless the identity of the lot has been changed.

(b) No assessment shall be paid on that portion of a person’s sales of agricultural or vegetable seed, or both, that is sold in containers of four ounces or less net weight of seed.

(c) No assessment shall be paid on agricultural or vegetable seed, or both, sold and shipped out of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52354.5.

The director shall fix the annual assessment established pursuant to Section 52354 in an amount that will provide sufficient funds to carry out this chapter, and the date and method of collecting the assessment. The board shall make a recommendation regarding the level of assessment to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 474, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52354.8.

If the assessment established pursuant to Section 52354 and fixed by the director pursuant to Section 52354.5 is not paid within one calendar month after the end of the fiscal year for which the assessment is made, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment shall be imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 474, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52355.

Any registrant who packages or labels seed, or both, with the name and address of the person who only retails the seed within the state shall, at the time of sale to such person, collect from the person whose name and address appears on the label, the assessment due based upon the invoice price for the seed, and pay such assessment to the director, as provided by regulations. The person collecting the assessment as provided under this section may charge, collect, and retain an additional reasonable fee established by the director for handling this collection and payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------

52356.

Total expenditures from funds derived from registration fees and dollar volume assessments under this chapter shall not exceed the department’s cost of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 45.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers of Enforcing Officers [52361. - 52363.]

52361.

The secretary, each commissioner, and any qualified representative of the commissioner, shall sample and inspect any agricultural or vegetable seed that is subject to this chapter at the time and place and to the extent as he or she may deem necessary to determine whether the agricultural or vegetable seed is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and notify promptly the person who is in possession or control of the seed of any violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52362.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, any officer who is required to enforce this chapter may enter upon any public or private premises during regular business hours in order to have access to any seed which is subject to this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52363.

(a) Any sample which is taken by an enforcement officer in accordance with the regulations which are adopted pursuant to this chapter for the taking of official samples is prima facie evidence of the true condition of the entire lot from which the sample was taken. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(b) A written report which is issued by the State Seed Laboratory that shows the analysis of any such sample is prima facie evidence of the true analysis of the entire lot from which the sample was taken. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)